Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 6. Motorcycle Rider Training Program

§ 731.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that a comprehensive training program for motorcycle operators would enhance operator safety and reduce the number of injuries that occur as a result of motorcycle crashes. Since the great majority of motorcycle crashes involve inexperienced operators, a training program focused on inexperienced operators is the primary purpose of this legislation. The training program established shall be operated pursuant to nationally recognized safety and training standards and shall be funded from registration and license fees paid by Vermont motorcycle operators.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that revenue from fee increases specified in this act shall be used for administration of the motorcycle rider training program and expenses relating to the program, including instructor training, licensing improvement, alcohol and drug education, public awareness, a driver improvement program for motorcyclists, technical assistance, program promotion, and other motorcycle safety programs. Funds may also be used for reimbursement of persons with course sites.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 1990; amended

1997, No. 9

, § 3, eff. May 6, 1997;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 159.

§ 732.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Chief instructor” means a licensed motorcycle operator who meets the standards established by the Department to qualify to train and oversee instructors for the motorcycle rider education program.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

“Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

“Motorcycle rider training program” means the Motorcycle Training and Information Disbursement Plan created in section 733 of this title.

“Program coordinator” means the person designated by the Commissioner to plan, organize, and administer the motorcycle rider training program as provided in subsection 733(b) of this title.

“Rider training course” means a motorcycle rider education curriculum and delivery system approved by the Department as meeting standards designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the safe operation of a motorcycle.

“Training specialist” means the person designated by the Commissioner to fulfill the obligations stated in subsection 733(c) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 1990.

§ 733.
Motorcycle rider training program.

The Department shall establish standards for and shall administer the motorcycle rider training program. The program shall include rider training courses and instructor training. The Department may expand the program to include public awareness, alcohol and drug effects, driver improvement for motorcyclists, licensing improvement, program promotion, or other motorcycle safety programs.

The Commissioner shall appoint a program coordinator who shall oversee and direct the program by setting program and funding guidelines, and conduct an annual evaluation.

The Commissioner shall also appoint one or more training specialists who shall assist in establishing rider training courses throughout the State, support and implement program and funding guidelines and supervise instructors and other personnel as necessary. The training specialist may be a trained chief instructor.

An adequate number of rider training courses shall be provided to meet the reasonably anticipated needs of all persons in the State who desire to participate in the program. The Department shall issue certificates of completion in the manner and form prescribed by the Commissioner to persons who satisfactorily complete the requirements of the course.

The Department may enter into contracts with either public or private institutions or organizations for technical assistance in conducting rider training courses, if the course is administered and taught according to standards established by the Department pursuant to this section for the motorcycle rider training program. If necessary, an organization conducting a rider training course shall charge a reasonable tuition fee which shall be determined by and paid to the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules that are necessary to carry out the provisions of the motorcycle rider training program.

In establishing standards for the motorcycle rider training program, the Department shall be guided by any existing national standards for such programs, including standards of the motorcycle safety foundation.

Any person, agencies, institutions, or organizations offering motorcycle safety instruction under the auspices of this subchapter, with respect to such instruction activities, are exempt from the requirements of subchapter 4 of this chapter relating to driver training school licenses.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 1990; amended

1997, No. 59

, § 76, eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 734.
Instructor requirements and training.

The Department shall establish standards for an approved motorcycle rider training instructor preparation course. Successful completion of the course shall require the participant to demonstrate knowledge of the course material, knowledge of safe motorcycle operating practices, riding proficiency, and the necessary aptitude for instructing students.

The Department shall establish minimum requirements for the qualifications of a rider training instructor. The minimum requirements shall include the following:

the instructor shall have a high school diploma or its equivalent;

the instructor shall be at least 21 years of age and must hold a valid motorcycle endorsement;

the instructor shall have at least four years of motorcycle riding experience during the last five years;

the instructor’s driver’s license shall not have been suspended or revoked at any time during the preceding two years;

the instructor shall not have any convictions for driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs during the preceding five years;

instructors who are licensed in other states shall furnish certified copies of their driving records to the Department;

an applicant shall not be eligible for instructor status until his or her driving record for the preceding five years, or the maximum number of years less than five for which a state retains driving records, is furnished; and

the instructor shall have an approved instructor certificate that may be a state or Motorcycle Safety Foundation certificate, and the instructor must be registered as a currently active instructor.

Temporary, seasonal employees of the Department of Motor Vehicles hired to provide motorcycle safety instruction, as well as any assistant instructors or range aides hired on a temporary, seasonal basis to provide or assist in the provision of motorcycle safety instruction, shall be exempt from the classified service created in 3 V.S.A. chapter 13.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 1990; amended

2001, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 28, 2002.

§ 735.
Repealed. 2009, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 26(10) and 2009, No. 152 (Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 736.
Implementation.

After a date to be established by the Commissioner in rules, any applicant for a permit or an operator’s license valid for operating a motorcycle, except a renewal applicant or an applicant who surrenders a valid motorcycle license issued by another state, shall successfully complete the rider training course established under this subchapter before taking the on-motorcycle portion of the license examination or, in his or her discretion, the Commissioner may require any applicant to successfully complete an approved classroom training curriculum before a motorcycle learner’s permit or motorcycle endorsement may be issued. The Department shall also exempt applicants who have successfully completed equivalent training courses in other states or provinces. The Commissioner shall not implement the rider training course until the Commissioner determines that the program can be operated effectively, and that there are adequate training vehicles, instructors, curriculum materials, training sites, and program funding to provide the training throughout the State to all those individuals who desire or would be required to complete the course.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 21, 1990; amended

1997, No. 9

, § 4, eff. May 6, 1997;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 160.